Utah statutes.
13-12-3.   Refiners or distributors -- Unlawful practices -- Marketing
agreements with dealers.
No refiner or distributor, directly or indirectly or through any office,
agent, or employee, shall engage in any of the following practices:
(1)  requiring a dealer, at the time of entering into a marketing agreement,
to agree to a release, assignment, novation, waiver or estoppel which would
relieve any person from any provision of this act;
(2)  prohibiting, directly or indirectly, the right of free association among
dealers for any lawful purpose;
(3)  requiring a dealer to keep his retail outlet open for business for any
specified number of hours per day, or days per week, unless those requirements
are set forth in writing at the time of entering into the marketing agreement;
(4)  fixing or maintaining the price at which the dealer must sell products,
or attempting to fix or maintain those prices, through any form of coercion
whatsoever; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a
distributor or refiner from suggesting prices or counseling with dealers
concerning those prices;
(5)  requiring a dealer to use or utilize any promotion, premium, coupon,
give-away, sales promotion or rebate in the operation of the business;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a dealer from
participating financially in a promotion, premium, coupon, give-away, sales
promotion or rebate sponsored by the distributor or refiner if agreed to
voluntarily by the parties;
(6)  terminating, canceling or failing to renew any marketing agreement
without having first given written notice setting forth all the reasons for
such termination, cancellation, or intent not to renew the dealer at least 90
days in advance of such termination, cancellation, or failure to renew,
except:
(a)  where the alleged grounds are voluntary abandonment by the dealer of the
marketing agreement relationship in which event the aforementioned written
notice shall be given five business days in advance of such termination,
cancellation, or failure to renew; and
(b)  where the alleged grounds are caused by the conviction of the dealer or
distributor in a court of competent jurisdiction of a criminal offense
directly related to the business conducted pursuant to the marketing
agreement, or the bankruptcy of the dealer or distributor, in which event the
aforementioned termination, cancellation, or failure to renew may be effective
immediately following such conviction or bankruptcy;
(c)  where the alleged grounds are:
(i)  failure of the dealer to substantially comply with the requirements of
the marketing agreement;
(ii)  action of the dealer fraudulently advising members of the motoring
public of the necessity for unneeded automotive repairs, parts or accessories;
(iii)  action of the dealer fraudulently representing either expressly or
impliedly the trade mark or brand of product being sold by the dealer;
(iv)  failure of the dealer to maintain the premises in a sufficiently clean
and healthful manner to avoid constituting a nuisance to members of the
motoring public or adjoining property owners as determined by the local board
of health authority;
in which event the distributor shall provide the dealer with written notice of
his intent to terminate, cancel or fail to renew, following which the dealer
shall be allowed 10 days in which to comply, correct or respond to said
allegations before further action can be taken by the distributor.
